Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2915.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 1-242.4, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 263, O.S.L. 2024 (63 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 1-242.4), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1-242.4. A. The Maternal Mortality Review Committee
shall be composed of eleven (11) members, or their designees, as
follows:
1. Eight of the members shall be:
a. the Chair of the Oklahoma Chapter of the American
College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists,
b. the President of the Oklahoma Chapter of the American
College of Nurse-Midwives,
Req. No. 11314 Page 1

c. the Medical Director for the Oklahoma Perinatal
Quality Improvement Collaborative,
d. the Director of the Maternal and Child Health Service
of the State Department of Health,
e. the Chair of the Oklahoma Chapter of the Association
of Women's Health, Obstetric and Neonatal Nurses,
f. the Executive Director of the Southern Plains Tribal
Health Board,
g. the Director of the Oklahoma Perinatal Quality
Improvement Collaborative, and
h. the administrative program manager of the Maternal and
Child Health Service Perinatal and Reproductive Health
Division; and
2. Three of the members shall be appointed by the State
Commissioner of Health to serve for two-year terms and shall be
eligible for reappointment. The members shall be persons having
training and experience in matters related to maternal mortality and
severe maternal morbidity. The members shall be appointed from the
following positions:
a. a physician who is a member of the Oklahoma State
Medical Association or the Oklahoma Osteopathic
Association,
b. a maternal-fetal medicine physician, and

Req. No. 11314 Page 2

c. an individual who has been affected by pregnancy-
related or pregnancy-associated deaths, severe
maternal morbidity, and/or lack of access to maternal
health care services.
B. Every two (2) years the Committee shall elect from among its
membership a chair and a vice chair. The Committee shall meet at
least quarterly and may meet more frequently as necessary as
determined by the chair.
C. The Maternal Mortality Review Committee may, as needed,
create advisory committees and assign members or non-members of the
Committee to participate.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-11314 TJ 01/01/25










Req. No. 11314 Page 3